California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) If the department determines that a modification is necessary pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consult with participants of the stakeholder process established pursuant to subdivision (c) to the extent practicable.

(3) If a
 modification is made, the department shall notify qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature within 10 business days of that modification.

(g) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained, and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(i) For purposes of this section:

(1) “340B” means the discount drug purchasing program described in Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) “Qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinic” means a center or clinic that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or a clinic operated by a city, county, city and county, or hospital authority that is exempt from licensure under subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, and that is a 340B covered entity pursuant to Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code for the duration of each applicable fiscal year for which the department implements this section.

(j) Upon implementation of Section 14105.468 and the completion of all closeout activities associated with this section, the director shall execute a declaration, which shall be
 retained by the director, stating that implementation of Section 14105.468 has commenced and that all closeout activities associated with this section have been completed. This section shall become inoperative one year after the date that the director executes the declaration and shall be repealed on January 1 of the year following the date upon which this section becomes inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 60.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.468.

(a) (1) Beginning for dates of service on or after January 1, 2025, the department shall establish and implement a directed payment program under which a qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinic may earn payments from contracted Medi-Cal managed care plans, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(2) (A) Beginning for dates of service on or after January 1, 2026, the department shall increase the amount of directed payments pursuant to paragraph (1) with amounts allocated from the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund in accordance with Section 14105.200.

(B) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing
 with Section 14199.100) to this part at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this paragraph shall be inoperative as of January 1, 2025.

(b) The department, in consultation with affected stakeholders, and affected Medi-Cal managed care plans, as applicable, shall establish the methodology or methodologies, parameters, and eligibility criteria for the directed payments pursuant to this section. This shall include, but is not limited to, the milestones and metrics that a qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinic shall meet in order to receive a directed payment from a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to this section. The department may implement the directed payment described in this subdivision using one or more of the models authorized by subsection (c) of Section 438.6 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) To the extent permissible under federal
 law, directed payments received by qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics pursuant to this section shall be considered separate and apart from the prospective payment system (PPS) reimbursement the clinic receives pursuant to subsection (bb) of Section 1396a of Title 42 of the United States Code and shall not be considered during annual reconciliation of the PPS rate.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(e) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only
 to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(f) For any calendar year in which this section is implemented, in whole or in part, and notwithstanding any other law, neither the department nor a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be required to make the payments specified in Section 14105.467.

(g) For purposes of this section:

(1) “340B” means the discount drug purchasing program described in Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) “Qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinic” means a center or clinic that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or a clinic operated by a city, county, city and
 county, or hospital authority that is exempt from licensure under subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, and that is a 340B covered entity pursuant to Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code for the duration of each applicable fiscal year for which the department implements this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 61.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.47.

(a) (1) The department shall establish a list of medical supplies. The list shall specify utilization controls to be applied to each medical supply product.

(2) The utilization controls specified shall include, but not be limited to, those provided by regulation of the department.

(3) The department shall notify providers at least 30 days prior to the effective date of a change in utilization controls.

(b) (1) The department shall establish a list of maximum allowable product costs (MAPCS) for medical supplies, which shall be published in provider bulletins.

(2) The department shall update existing MAPCS and establish additional MAPCS in accordance with all of the following:

(A) In establishing the MAPCS, the director shall assure that eligible persons shall receive medical supply products that are available to the public generally, without discrimination or segregation based purely on economic disability.

(B) All related medical supply products within each particular medical supply type available for retail distribution shall be reviewed by the department in consultation with representatives from the California Association of Medical Product Suppliers and the California Pharmacists Association.

(C) The department shall base MAPCS on the mean of the wholesale selling price of related medical supply products
 that are available in California. For purposes of this section, “wholesale selling price” means the price, including discounts and rebates, paid by a provider to a wholesaler, distributor, or manufacturer for a medical supply product.

(D) In establishing the MAPCS, the department shall consider the provider related costs of the product that include, but are not limited to, shipping, handling, storage, and delivery.

(E) The department shall notify Medi-Cal providers at least 30 days prior to the effective date of MAPCS.

(c) (1) In establishing the list of medical supplies, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis with manufacturers, distributors, dispensers, or suppliers of medical supplies pursuant to
 Section 14105.3.

(2) To ensure that the health needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are met, the department shall, when evaluating a decision to execute a contract, and when evaluating medical supplies for retention on, addition to, or deletion from, the list of medical supplies, consider all of the following criteria:

(A) The safety of the product.

(B) The effectiveness of the product.

(C) The essential need for the product.

(D) The potential for misuse of the product.

(E) The immediate or long-term cost effectiveness of the product.

(3) The deficiency of a product when measured by one of the criteria specified in paragraph (2) may be sufficient to support a decision that the product should be deleted from, should not be added to, or should not be retained on, the list of medical supplies. However, the superiority of a product under one criterion may be sufficient to warrant the addition or retention of the product, notwithstanding a deficiency in another criterion.

(4) In the evaluation of the effectiveness of a product, the department may require the manufacturer, distributor, dispenser, or supplier to submit its products to testing by an independent laboratory. For the purposes of this section, “independent laboratory” means an analytical laboratory that is not a subsidiary of, affiliated with, or on retainer for, the manufacturer, distributor, dispenser, or supplier. The department shall only utilize this paragraph involving products where there is a
 demonstrated experience of a significant variation in performance among the products subject to this particular contracting process.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, actions under this section shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act or to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 58.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.475.

(a) In maintaining the lists of medical supplies, incontinence medical supplies, and enteral nutrition products, the department may perform a review of, and contract for, various products in a specific product category.

(b) The department shall notify each manufacturer of products in the categories selected pursuant to Sections 14105.47, 14105.8, and Sections 14125 to 14125.9, inclusive.

(c) If, within 30 days of notification, a manufacturer does not enter into negotiations for a contract pursuant to those sections, the department may delete the products from their respective lists, or refuse to
 consider for addition, products of that manufacturer in the selected product categories.

(d) If, after 270 days from the initial notification, a contract is not executed for a product currently on the list of medical supplies, incontinence medical supplies, or enteral nutrition products, the department may delete the product from its respective list.

(e) If, within 270 days from the initial notification, a contract is executed for a product currently on the list of medical supplies, incontinence medical supplies, or enteral nutrition products, the department shall retain the product on its respective list.

(f) If, within 270 days from the date of the initial notification, a contract is executed for a product not currently on the list of medical supplies, incontinence medical supplies, or enteral nutrition products,
 the department shall add the product to its respective list.

(g) The department shall terminate all negotiations 270 days after the initial notification.

(h) The department may delete any product from its respective list at the expiration of the contract term or when the contract between the department and the manufacturer of that product is terminated.

(i) In the absence of a contract, the department may deem any product on the list of medical supplies, incontinence medical supplies, or enteral nutrition products, a nonbenefit of the program and delete that product from its respective list.

(j) Deletions made to the lists of medical supplies, incontinence supplies, and enteral nutrition products, shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after
 publication of the changes in provider bulletins.

(k) (1) A manufacturer of a medical supply, incontinence supply, or enteral nutrition product denied a contract pursuant to this section, or pursuant to Sections
 14105.47, 14105.8, and Sections 14125 to 14125.9, inclusive, may file an appeal of that decision with the director within 30 calendar days of the department’s written decision.

(2) The director shall issue a final decision on the appeal within 60 calendar days of the postmark date of the appeal.

(l) The department shall provide individual notice to Medi-Cal beneficiaries at least 60 calendar days prior to the effective date of the deletion or suspension of any product pursuant to this subdivision. The notice shall include a description of the beneficiary’s right to a fair hearing and shall encourage the beneficiary to consult a physician to determine if an appropriate substitute product is available from Medi-Cal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 59.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.48.

(a) The department shall establish a list of covered services and maximum allowable reimbursement rates for durable medical equipment, as defined in Section 51160 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and the list shall be published in provider manuals. The list shall specify utilization controls to be applied to each type of durable medical equipment.

(b) Reimbursement for durable medical equipment, except wheelchairs, wheelchair accessories, and speech-generating devices and related accessories, shall be the lesser of (1) the amount billed pursuant to Section 51008.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, (2) an amount that does not exceed 80 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare
 Program for the same or similar item or service, or (3) the guaranteed acquisition cost negotiated by means of the contracting process provided for pursuant to Section 14105.3 plus a percentage markup to be established by the department.

(c) Reimbursement for wheelchairs, wheelchair accessories, and speech-generating devices and related accessories shall be the lesser of (1) the amount billed pursuant to Section 51008.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, (2) an amount that does not exceed 100 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare Program for the same or similar item or service, or (3) the guaranteed acquisition cost negotiated by means of the contracting process provided for pursuant to Section 14105.3 plus a percentage markup to be established by the department.

(d) Reimbursement for all durable medical
 equipment billed to the Medi-Cal program utilizing codes with no specified maximum allowable rate shall be the lesser of (1) the amount billed pursuant to Section 51008.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, (2) the guaranteed acquisition cost negotiated by means of the contracting process provided for pursuant to Section 14105.3 plus a percentage markup to be established by the department, (3) the actual acquisition cost plus a markup to be established by the department, (4) the manufacturer’s suggested retail purchase price on or prior to the date of service, and documented by a printed catalog or a hard copy of an electronic catalog page showing that price, reduced by a percentage discount not to exceed 20 percent, or not to exceed 15 percent for wheelchairs and wheelchair accessories if the provider employs or contracts with a qualified rehabilitation technology professional, as defined in Section 14132.85, or (5) a price established through targeted product-specific cost containment
 provisions developed with providers.

(e) Reimbursement for all durable medical equipment supplies and accessories billed to the Medi-Cal program shall be the lesser of (1) the amount billed pursuant to Section 51008.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, or (2) the acquisition cost plus a 23 percent markup.

(f) (1) Commencing January 1, 2007, reimbursement for oxygen delivery systems and oxygen contents shall utilize national HCPCS codes, and shall be the lesser of (1) the amount billed pursuant to Section 51008.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, (2) an amount that does not exceed 80 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare Program for the same or a similar item or service, or (3) the guaranteed acquisition cost negotiated by means of the contracting process provided for
 pursuant to Section 14105.3, plus a percentage markup to be established by the department.

(2) Effective July 1, 2022, reimbursement for durable medical equipment that is considered to be oxygen and respiratory equipment, as determined by the department, shall not exceed 100 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare Program for the same or similar item or service.

(g) Within six months of the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, the department shall review utilization of services and equipment resulting from the changes to this section made by that act, and shall assess whether the changes are contributing to inappropriate use of those services or equipment. If the department’s review finds an increase in inappropriate use of those services or equipment, the Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative
 Budget Committee of the State Department of Health Services’ findings and recommended changes to ensure program integrity.

(h) Any regulation in Division 3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations that contains provisions for reimbursement rates for durable medical equipment shall be amended or repealed effective for dates of service on or after the date of the act adding this section.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(j) The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing this
 section with respect to all of the following:

(1) Notifying the provider representatives of the proposed change.

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting to discuss the change.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the change.

(4) Providing advance notice on the implementation and effective date of the change.

(k) The department may require providers of durable medical equipment to appeal Medicare denials for dually eligible beneficiaries as a condition of Medi-Cal payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 94.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.49.

(a) (1) The department shall establish a list of Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) codes billable to the Medi-Cal program and reimbursement rates, subject to Section 51319 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, hearing aids, and the list shall be published in the Medi-Cal Provider Manual.

(2) The department may implement this section by provider manual or bulletin. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative
 Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code), actions of the department under this section shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act or to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(b) The maximum reimbursement rate for hearing aids shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) The maximum allowable amount established by the department.

(2) The one-unit wholesale cost, plus a markup determined by the department.

(3) The billed amount.

(4) The rate established by the department’s contracting program.

(c) The maximum reimbursement rate for hearing aid supplies and accessories shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) The retail price.

(2) The wholesale cost, plus a markup determined by the department.

(3) The billed amount.

(4) The rate established by the department’s contracting program.

(d) The maximum reimbursement rate for molds or inserts shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) The maximum amount allowable established by the department.

(2) The billed amount.

(3) The rate established by the department’s contracting program.

(e) The maximum reimbursement for repairs, subsequent to the guarantee period, shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) The invoice cost plus a markup determined by the department.

(2) The billed amount.

(3) The rate established by the department’s contracting program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 74, Sec. 67.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.5.

The director or prepaid health plans shall make no payment for services rendered prior to January 1, 1977, to any health facility that secures a license under the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code after July 1, 1970, covering a new facility or additional bed capacity or the conversion of existing bed capacity to a different license category, unless the licensee received a favorable final decision by the voluntary area health planning agency in the area, the consumer members of a voluntary area
 health planning agency acting as an appeals body or the Advisory Health Council pursuant to Sections 127155 to 127235, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code; or unless the licensee had filed an application for a license prior to January 1, 1970, and the application met all then-existing requirements and regulations of the appropriate state agency at the time of application including, at least, preliminary submission of plans, and if the licensee commences construction of his or her project prior to July 1, 1971, and if the licensee has on file with the department a notarized affidavit from the building department having jurisdiction indicating that substantial progress on the approved project was attained by January 1, 1973, and the licensee has on file with the county recorder and department a valid notice of construction completion indicating January 1, 1974, as the completion date; except that the department shall extend the foregoing dates by no more than a total of two years in the case of projects
 where delay has resulted from the death of the original applicant, and shall extend the foregoing dates by no more than a total of one year in the case of projects where other good cause has been shown why the extension should be granted. The exception provided for in the preceding sentence with respect to applications filed prior to January 1, 1970, except for transfers executed before November 30, 1970, or after July 1, 1971, shall not apply to transferees of the applications of the original applicants.

Voluntary area health planning agencies may extend, until July 1, 1972, the date upon which applicants, qualifying under the exception in this section, shall commence construction, if the voluntary area health planning agencies declare that good cause has been shown why the extension should be granted, provided that an applicant applying for the extension had, prior to January 1, 1970, received approval of a health planning association in the county wherein the
 applicant is located. Applicants receiving extension of the construction commencement date shall have on file with the department a notarized affidavit from the building department having jurisdiction indicating that substantial progress on the approved project was attained by January 1, 1974, and have on file with the county recorder and department a valid notice of construction completion indicating January 1, 1975, as the completion date; except that the department shall extend each of the foregoing dates by no more than a total of one year in the case of projects where good cause has been shown why the extension should be granted.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “substantial progress” is defined and evidenced as follows:

(1) For structures of three or fewer stories, completion of the foundations and footings; the structural frame; the mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
 rough-in; the rough flooring; the exterior walls and windows; and the finished roof. 

(2) For structures of more than three stories, a contractor’s schedule of work shall be filed with the department by January 1, 1973. Every three months thereafter, until completion, evidence shall be submitted to the department that construction is progressing on that schedule.

(b) For the purposes of this section, construction of a project is deemed commenced on the date the applicant was so notified by the department, if so notified, or on the date the applicant has completed not less than all of the following:

(1) Submission to the appropriate state agency of a written agreement executed between the applicant and a licensed general contractor to construct and complete the facility within a designated time schedule in accordance
 with final architectural plans and specifications approved by the agency.

(2) Obtaining the initial permits or approval for commencing work on the project that is customarily issued for projects of the scope of applicant by the governmental agency having jurisdiction over the construction.

(3) Completion of construction work on the project to such a degree as to justify and require a progress payment by the applicant to the general contractor under terms of the construction agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 473.5.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.51.

(a) The department shall establish “capped rental” reimbursement for specific items of durable medical equipment. Items in this category shall be reimbursed on a monthly rental basis not to exceed a period of continuous use of 10 months. After 10 months of rental have been paid, the provider shall continue to provide the item without charge, except for maintenance and servicing fees, until the medical necessity ends or Medi-Cal coverage ceases. Monthly reimbursement for the rental of these specific items of durable medical equipment may
 not exceed 80 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare program for the same or similar item or service.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, actions under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act or to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(c) The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in determining which items will be subject to capped rental, including doing all of the following:

(1) Notifying provider representatives of the items that will be subject to capped rental.

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting to
 discuss the items.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the items.

(4) Providing advance notice of the effective date on and after which the items will be subject to capped rental.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 67.5.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.6.

No health facility licensed under the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be entitled to receive, or shall receive, any payment whatsoever from the director, or from any prepaid health plan, for any services rendered to any Medi-Cal program beneficiary if the health facility has commenced construction of a project after January 1, 1977, and the health facility has failed to obtain a certificate of need covering such project issued pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 437) of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon commencement of such a project, or as soon thereafter as possible, the
 director or the prepaid health plan shall notify the facility in writing of termination of all payments for any services rendered in any portion of the facility after 30 days from the date the notice is mailed.

For the purposes of this section, a “project” shall mean any project for which a certificate of need is required pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 437) of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 854.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.7.

(a) In order to fairly reimburse pharmacies for the furnishing of prescription drugs to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the director shall update allowable drug product prices within seven days of receiving notice of a drug product price change. Notice to the director shall include, but not be limited to, publication of the price change in the supplier’s catalog or supplement or in nationally distributed drug price reference guides.

(b) No regulation reducing allowable drug
 product cost reimbursement or removing a drug from the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs shall be operative until at least 30 days after eligible pharmacies have been mailed a notice of the reimbursement limitation by the department or the fiscal intermediary.

(c) The director shall limit the rate of payment for the professional fee portion of prescription services rendered under this chapter pursuant to Section 4064 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 11201 of the Health and Safety Code and the professional fee portion of prescription services rendered as a refill immediately subsequent to such prescription to ensure that the total professional fee paid for the two services does not exceed the professional fee paid for the same prescription refill when provided as a routine service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 80, Sec. 25.5.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.75.

(a) In order to ensure that drug products in an injectable form that are not administered by the patient are available to Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to federal law, the department shall do all of the following with respect to any such drug product:

(1) (A) Develop and publish a medical benefit drug utilization policy within 180 days of being notified by the manufacturer of approval of the product by the federal Food and Drug Administration. The
 policy shall be published in the Medi-Cal provider bulletin that immediately follows that 180-day period. The effective date of the drug utilization policy shall be no later than the publication date of the bulletin.

(B) If the department is unable to complete and publish the policy within the period specified in subparagraph (A), the department shall, until completion of the utilization policy, allow providers to use the utilization standards approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that are contained in the official package circular or insert for the product when the department reviews a provider’s submission for utilization of the product. The department shall allow the product to be billed and reimbursed using a miscellaneous billing code until the permanent code is assigned and published pursuant to paragraph (3).

(2) Evaluate the necessity of utilization
 controls, and publish all utilization controls in both the final drug utilization policy and the Medi-Cal provider bulletin.

(3) Ensure that the fiscal intermediary enters into the Medi-Cal database the code assigned to the product within 60 days of the date the code was assigned to the product.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the department’s authority to require a provider to obtain prior authorization for dispensing or administering an injectable drug.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.8.

(a) The department may enter into contracts with manufacturers of enteral nutrition products that can be used as a therapeutic regimen to prevent serious disability or death in patients with medically diagnosed conditions that preclude the full use of regular food, on a bid or nonbid basis. The department shall maintain a list of those products for which contracts have been executed. For those contracts that generate rebates, those rebates shall be managed through the department’s drug rebate accounting system.

(b) (1) To ensure that the health needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are met, the department shall, when evaluating a
 decision to execute a contract, and when evaluating enteral nutrition products for retention on, addition to, or deletion from, the list of enteral nutrition products, consider all of the following criteria:

(A) The safety of the product.

(B) The effectiveness of the product.

(C) The essential need for the product.

(D) The potential for misuse of the product.

(E) The immediate or long-term cost effectiveness of the product.

(2) The deficiency of a product when measured by one of the criteria specified in paragraph (1) may be sufficient to
 support a decision that the product should be deleted from, should not be added to, or should not be retained on, the list of medical supplies. However, the superiority of a product under one criterion may be sufficient to warrant the addition or retention of the product, notwithstanding a deficiency in another criterion.

(c) In order that Medi-Cal beneficiaries may have access to a comprehensive range of enteral nutrition products pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall ensure that there is representation on the list of both general use and specialized use enteral nutrition products. The department deems all products designed to meet the normal needs of infants, and all products that are an incomplete source of nutrition, including modular products, and all products intended for use in weight loss, are not benefits of the
 Medi-Cal program. The department may deem an incomplete product a benefit for patients with diagnoses, including, but not limited to, malabsorption and inborn errors of metabolism, when the product either appropriately lacks only an offending nutrient, or has been shown to not be investigational nor experimental when used as part of a therapeutic regimen to prevent serious disability or death, or when both conditions apply.

(d) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature declares that an expedited process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts entered into on a nonbid basis shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(e) Deletions made to the list of enteral nutrition
 products shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after publication of the changes in provider bulletins.

(f) Changes made to the list of enteral nutrition products under this or any other section are exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(g) The department may provide beneficiaries continuing care for products deleted from the list of enteral nutrition products. The department shall assess the need for continuing care based on the criteria in subdivision (b) and the potential impact on beneficiary access to appropriate therapy. To be eligible for continuing care status under this subdivision, a beneficiary must be taking the enteral nutrition product when the product is deleted. Additionally, the department shall have received a claim for the enteral nutrition product with a date of service that is within 100 days
 prior to the date the product was deleted. A beneficiary shall remain eligible for continuing care status provided that a claim is submitted for the enteral nutrition product in question at least every 100 days and the date of service of the claim is within 100 days of the date of service of the last claim submitted for the same enteral nutrition product.

(h) The department shall provide individual notice to Medi-Cal beneficiaries at least 60 calendar days prior to the effective date of the deletion of any enteral nutrition product from the list of enteral nutrition products. The notice shall include a description of the beneficiary’s right to a fair hearing and shall encourage the beneficiary to consult a physician to determine if an appropriate substitute enteral nutrition product is available from Medi-Cal.

(i) Enteral nutrition products authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available only through prior authorization. The department may designate those enteral nutrition products that are without a contract as not being a benefit of the Medi-Cal program, except in the case of continuing care as described in subdivision (h) of this section.

(j) Contracts executed pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(k) (1) Manufacturers shall calculate and pay interest on late or unpaid rebates.

(2) Interest pursuant to paragraph (1) shall begin accruing 38 calendar days from the date of mailing of the quarterly invoice, including supporting utilization data sent to the manufacturer. Interest shall continue to accrue until the date of mailing of the manufacturer’s payment.

(3) Interest rates and calculations pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be identical and shall be equal to the drug rebate interest rates as determined by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid Drug Rebate Program Releases or regulations.

(4) If the date of mailing of a state rebate payment is 69 days or more from the date of mailing of the invoice, including supporting utilization data sent to the manufacturer, the interest rate shall be as specified in paragraph (3),
 however the interest rate shall be increased by 10 percentage points.

(l) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 447.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.85.
